public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A r de maner
SFX A r de ofrir
SFX A r de parer
SFX A r de poder
SFX A r de poer
SFX A r de poser
SFX A r de salir
SFX A r de saƚir
SFX A r de servir
SFX A r de vestir
SFX A r di [ai]r
SFX A r do [ai]r
SFX A r ge [^aàbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ensir
SFX A r ge [^aàbcdđéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]mentir
SFX A r ge [^aàbcdđéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]morir
SFX A r ge [ao]ler
SFX A r ge [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ge [en]guir
SFX A r ge [ps]entir
SFX A r ge dormir
SFX A r ge esir
SFX A r ge eñir
SFX A r ge koñer
SFX A r ge maner
SFX A r ge ofrir
SFX A r ge parer
SFX A r ge poder
SFX A r ge poer
SFX A r ge poser
SFX A r ge salir
SFX A r ge saƚir
SFX A r ge servir
SFX A r ge vestir
SFX A r lo/S [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúv]dar
SFX A r lo/S [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉkƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]star
SFX A r lo/S [bjmptuxàđŧɉ]er
SFX A r lo/S [lnruàèéíòú]der
SFX A r lo/S [lréíò‘]ver
SFX A r lo/S [mpr]efar
SFX A r lo/S [nàéòó]ser
SFX A r lo/S [ot]rafar
SFX A r lo/S [rèó]ner
SFX A r lo/S [àèéò]ñer
SFX A r lo/S [èò]ler
SFX A r lo/S [èò]ƚer
SFX A r lo/S [òó]rer
SFX A r lo/S far
SFX A r lo/S ikuefar
SFX A r lo/S konfar
SFX A r lo/S movestar
SFX A r lo/S redar
SFX A r lo/S sotostar
SFX A r lo/S tèser
SFX A r lo/S ‘nar
SFX A r lo/S ‘ndar
SFX A r me/H [ao]ler
SFX A r me/H [ao]ƚer
SFX A r me/H [a‘]ver
SFX A r me/H aer
SFX A r me/H ir
SFX A r me/H koñer
SFX A r me/H maner
SFX A r me/H parer
SFX A r me/H parir
SFX A r me/H partir
SFX A r me/H poser
SFX A r me/H sorbir
SFX A r me/H vertir
SFX A r me/H ‘ver
SFX A r mi/K ‘ver
SFX A r mo poer
SFX A r mo/L [ao]er
SFX A r mo/L [ao]ler
SFX A r mo/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r mo/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r mo/L ir
SFX A r mo/L koñer
SFX A r mo/L maner
SFX A r mo/L parer
SFX A r mo/L poder
SFX A r mo/L poser
SFX A r n poer
SFX A r n/L [ao]er
SFX A r n/L [ao]ler
SFX A r n/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r n/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r n/L koñer
SFX A r n/L maner
SFX A r n/L parer
SFX A r n/L poder
SFX A r n/L poser
SFX A r ndo [a‘]ver
SFX A r ndo aer
SFX A r ndo aver
SFX A r ndo ‘ver
SFX A r ndo/E [ai]r
SFX A r ndo/E [ao]ler
SFX A r ndo/E [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ndo/E koñer
SFX A r ndo/E maner
SFX A r ndo/E parer
SFX A r ndo/E poder
SFX A r ndo/E poer
SFX A r ndo/E poser
SFX A r ne [ao]ler
SFX A r ne [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ne koñer
SFX A r ne maner
SFX A r ne parer
SFX A r ne poder
SFX A r ne poer
SFX A r ne poser
SFX A r ni/M [ao]er
SFX A r ni/M [ao]ler
SFX A r ni/M [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ni/M [a‘]ver
SFX A r ni/M koñer
SFX A r ni/M maner
SFX A r ni/M parer
SFX A r ni/M poder
SFX A r ni/M poser
SFX A r nte [ao]er
SFX A r nte [ao]ler
SFX A r nte [ao]ƚer
SFX A r nte [a‘]ver
SFX A r nte ar
SFX A r nte koñer
SFX A r nte maner
SFX A r nte parer
SFX A r nte poder
SFX A r nte poser
SFX A r r [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX A r r [a‘]ver
SFX A r r aer
SFX A r r déver
SFX A r r/E [ai]r
SFX A r r/E [bdjlmnoprtuxàñđŧƚɉ]er
SFX A r r/E [bsŧ]éver
SFX A r r/E [lríò]ver
SFX A r r/E [noàéòó]ser
SFX A r r/E tèser
SFX A r ralo/S [ai]r
SFX A r ralo/S [ao]er
SFX A r ralo/S [ao]ler
SFX A r ralo/S [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ralo/S [a‘]ver
SFX A r ralo/S koñer
SFX A r ralo/S maner
SFX A r ralo/S parer
SFX A r ralo/S poder
SFX A r ralo/S poser
SFX A r rami/K [ai]r
SFX A r rami/K [ao]er
SFX A r rami/K [ao]ler
SFX A r rami/K [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rami/K [a‘]ver
SFX A r rami/K koñer
SFX A r rami/K maner
SFX A r rami/K parer
SFX A r rami/K poder
SFX A r rami/K poser
SFX A r ratu/O [ai]r
SFX A r ratu/O [ao]er
SFX A r ratu/O [ao]ler
SFX A r ratu/O [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ratu/O [a‘]ver
SFX A r ratu/O koñer
SFX A r ratu/O maner
SFX A r ratu/O parer
SFX A r ratu/O poder
SFX A r ratu/O poser
SFX A r rave/RT [ai]r
SFX A r rave/RT [ao]er
SFX A r rave/RT [ao]ler
SFX A r rave/RT [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rave/RT [a‘]ver
SFX A r rave/RT koñer
SFX A r rave/RT maner
SFX A r rave/RT parer
SFX A r rave/RT poder
SFX A r rave/RT poser
SFX A r re r
SFX A r remo/L [ai]r
SFX A r remo/L [ao]er
SFX A r remo/L [ao]ler
SFX A r remo/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r remo/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r remo/L koñer
SFX A r remo/L maner
SFX A r remo/L parer
SFX A r remo/L poder
SFX A r remo/L poser
SFX A r ren/L [ai]r
SFX A r ren/L [ao]er
SFX A r ren/L [ao]ler
SFX A r ren/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r ren/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r ren/L koñer
SFX A r ren/L maner
SFX A r ren/L parer
SFX A r ren/L poder
SFX A r ren/L poser
SFX A r reni/M [ai]r
SFX A r reni/M [ao]er
SFX A r reni/M [ao]ler
SFX A r reni/M [ao]ƚer
SFX A r reni/M [a‘]ver
SFX A r reni/M koñer
SFX A r reni/M maner
SFX A r reni/M parer
SFX A r reni/M poder
SFX A r reni/M poser
SFX A r rense [ai]r
SFX A r rense [ao]er
SFX A r rense [ao]ler
SFX A r rense [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rense [a‘]ver
SFX A r rense koñer
SFX A r rense maner
SFX A r rense parer
SFX A r rense poder
SFX A r rense poser
SFX A r resi/P [ai]r
SFX A r resi/P [ao]er
SFX A r resi/P [ao]ler
SFX A r resi/P [ao]ƚer
SFX A r resi/P [a‘]ver
SFX A r resi/P koñer
SFX A r resi/P maner
SFX A r resi/P parer
SFX A r resi/P poder
SFX A r resi/P poser
SFX A r resiu/Q [ai]r
SFX A r resiu/Q [ao]er
SFX A r resiu/Q [ao]ler
SFX A r resiu/Q [ao]ƚer
SFX A r resiu/Q [a‘]ver
SFX A r resiu/Q koñer
SFX A r resiu/Q maner
SFX A r resiu/Q parer
SFX A r resiu/Q poder
SFX A r resiu/Q poser
SFX A r rge [^aàbcdđéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]aer
SFX A r rge [^aàbcdđéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]aver
SFX A r rge [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX A r rge ‘ver
SFX A r rimo/L [ao]er
SFX A r rimo/L [ao]ler
SFX A r rimo/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rimo/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r rimo/L koñer
SFX A r rimo/L maner
SFX A r rimo/L parer
SFX A r rimo/L poder
SFX A r rimo/L poser
SFX A r rion/L [ai]r
SFX A r rion/L [ao]er
SFX A r rion/L [ao]ler
SFX A r rion/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rion/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r rion/L koñer
SFX A r rion/L maner
SFX A r rion/L parer
SFX A r rion/L poder
SFX A r rion/L poser
SFX A r rioni/M [ai]r
SFX A r rioni/M [ao]er
SFX A r rioni/M [ao]ler
SFX A r rioni/M [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rioni/M [a‘]ver
SFX A r rioni/M koñer
SFX A r rioni/M maner
SFX A r rioni/M parer
SFX A r rioni/M poder
SFX A r rioni/M poser
SFX A r rionse [ai]r
SFX A r rionse [ao]er
SFX A r rionse [ao]ler
SFX A r rionse [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rionse [a‘]ver
SFX A r rionse koñer
SFX A r rionse maner
SFX A r rionse parer
SFX A r rionse poder
SFX A r rionse poser
SFX A r risen/L [ai]r
SFX A r risen/L [ao]er
SFX A r risen/L [ao]ler
SFX A r risen/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r risen/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r risen/L koñer
SFX A r risen/L maner
SFX A r risen/L parer
SFX A r risen/L poder
SFX A r risen/L poser
SFX A r riseni/M [ai]r
SFX A r riseni/M [ao]er
SFX A r riseni/M [ao]ler
SFX A r riseni/M [ao]ƚer
SFX A r riseni/M [a‘]ver
SFX A r riseni/M koñer
SFX A r riseni/M maner
SFX A r riseni/M parer
SFX A r riseni/M poder
SFX A r riseni/M poser
SFX A r risense [ai]r
SFX A r risense [ao]er
SFX A r risense [ao]ler
SFX A r risense [ao]ƚer
SFX A r risense [a‘]ver
SFX A r risense koñer
SFX A r risense maner
SFX A r risense parer
SFX A r risense poder
SFX A r risense poser
SFX A r rision/L [ai]r
SFX A r rision/L [ao]er
SFX A r rision/L [ao]ler
SFX A r rision/L [ao]ƚer
SFX A r rision/L [a‘]ver
SFX A r rision/L koñer
SFX A r rision/L maner
SFX A r rision/L parer
SFX A r rision/L poder
SFX A r rision/L poser
SFX A r risioni/M [ai]r
SFX A r risioni/M [ao]er
SFX A r risioni/M [ao]ler
SFX A r risioni/M [ao]ƚer
SFX A r risioni/M [a‘]ver
SFX A r risioni/M koñer
SFX A r risioni/M maner
SFX A r risioni/M parer
SFX A r risioni/M poder
SFX A r risioni/M poser
SFX A r risionse [ai]r
SFX A r risionse [ao]er
SFX A r risionse [ao]ler
SFX A r risionse [ao]ƚer
SFX A r risionse [a‘]ver
SFX A r risionse koñer
SFX A r risionse maner
SFX A r risionse parer
SFX A r risionse poder
SFX A r risionse poser
SFX A r risié/P [ai]r
SFX A r risié/P [ao]er
SFX A r risié/P [ao]ler
SFX A r risié/P [ao]ƚer
SFX A r risié/P [a‘]ver
SFX A r risié/P koñer
SFX A r risié/P maner
SFX A r risié/P parer
SFX A r risié/P poder
SFX A r risié/P poser
SFX A r risiéu/Q [ai]r
SFX A r risiéu/Q [ao]er
SFX A r risiéu/Q [ao]ler
SFX A r risiéu/Q [ao]ƚer
SFX A r risiéu/Q [a‘]ver
SFX A r risiéu/Q koñer
SFX A r risiéu/Q maner
SFX A r risiéu/Q parer
SFX A r risiéu/Q poder
SFX A r risiéu/Q poser
