public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
aerar/A
albedar/A
aƚegrar/A
realŧar/A
analixar/A
dexanemar/A
àrder/A
arđinar/A
dexarmixar/A
asar/A
asaƚar/A
asionar/A
gaver/A
reavar/A
xbagaŧar/A
inbaɉokar/A
dexbaƚar/A
xbalansar/A
inbalinar/A
xbalordir/A
strabalŧar/A
bandexar/A
banketar/A
xbarajar/A
inbarbojar/A
barkixar/A
strabastar/A
dexbatedar/A
batoƚar/A
dexbautar/A
xbavixar/A
bekar/A
dexbendar/A
xbertonar/A
xbevaciar/A
xbiankedar/A
biasugar/A
binar/A
xbingoƚar/A
inbisakar/A
bixigoƚar/A
bóɉer/A
sobojir/A
xboxoƚar/A
xboloñar/A
inbonar/A
rebondoƚar/A
bordir/A
borondolar/A
inbotar/A
botonar/A
dexboŧolar/A
brakiđar/A
inbragetar/A
brankar/A
brasolar/A
xbrefelar/A
inbriɉar/A
xbrodolar/A
inbroketar/A
xbronkoƚar/A
brunir/A
xbudeƚar/A
buƚegar/A
inbustar/A
inbuxarir/A
recamar/A
scaređar/A
cekar/A
koncèñer/A
intracéñer/A
cexar/A
cokar/A
conbar/A
predir/A
daneđar/A
dekorar/A
destrejar/A
dexinar/A
disipar/A
predíxer/A
dolar/A
indolŧir/A
domisiƚiar/A
indopionar/A
indosar/A
adular/A
daltronar/A
đogar/A
dexđónxer/A
rinđovenar/A
sperxurar/A
elèxer/A
espèler/A
exonerar/A
faelar/A
falsar/A
faorexar/A
infaŧolar/A
notifegar/A
sfénder/A
festedar/A
sfiankar/A
figurar/A
finar/A
fioŧinar/A
fluir/A
folar/A
sforbedar/A
fornegar/A
fraɉar/A
infrapoƚar/A
infraxar/A
desfríder/A
sfruñar/A
fumegar/A
dexgabanar/A
dexgaletar/A
ganbinar/A
xgarbuɉar/A
ingatolar/A
dexgobar/A
gorgedar/A
xgramoƚar/A
dexgrasar/A
dexgrexar/A
grevar/A
ingriŧolir/A
grostinar/A
guarantir/A
dexgustar/A
induxiar/A
reinproverar/A
intronar/A
tranxíjer/A
xjavetar/A
ɉetar/A
xɉoŧar/A
jutar/A
rinkagar/A
skalivar/A
kalŧar/A
akanar/A
kanforar/A
kantuŧar/A
rekapitoƚar/A
inkarbonir/A
inkaroñar/A
inkartosar/A
inkatarigolar/A
inkaŧar/A
skavaƚar/A
inkinar/A
koɉonar/A
inkoƚegar/A
komenŧiar/A
konglomerar/A
konsumar/A
rekonŧar/A
strakórer/A
skòrder/A
skorsiđar/A
inkoŧar/A
krear/A
krikoƚar/A
inkrostolar/A
kuadridar/A
skuèrxer/A
skular/A
kuŧolar/A
xlangolir/A
lapaŧar/A
dexlatar/A
inleamar/A
deƚeguar/A
ƚevar/A
skuilibrar/A
ƚimegar/A
ƚisiar/A
prolongar/A
luamar/A
dexluviar/A
dexmagrar/A
xmanarar/A
mantekar/A
markar/A
marŧir/A
mastruŧar/A
stramasar/A
inframeđar/A
dexmenar/A
xmeravejar/A
konprométer/A
xmilsir/A
mobijar/A
amolir/A
mónđer/A
demoraƚixar/A
dexmorsar/A
mucegarar/A
remurkiar/A
inmuxonar/A
xnaxar/A
ninar/A
noƚixar/A
anuƚar/A
obedir/A
okelar/A
onduƚar/A
orbar/A
ornar/A
spacarar/A
despajar/A
paƚetar/A
spalpeđar/A
despanocar/A
parar/A
pariđar/A
partorir/A
inpastar/A
spatriar/A
inpaverar/A
inpejar/A
inpelukar/A
respénder/A
inpensierir/A
inperlar/A
peteđar/A
despetrir/A
piantar/A
konpiàxer/A
pilar/A
piòver/A
pitufar/A
pixoƚar/A
spoƚinar/A
póner/A
spongar/A
pontixar/A
portar/A
inpotacar/A
prénder/A
reprexentar/A
prosimar/A
puñalar/A
spusar/A
iraixar/A
ranđar/A
raxonar/A
reklutar/A
rengar/A
xridakiar/A
riŧolir/A
roeđar/A
ronfar/A
rostelar/A
inruđenir/A
rusar/A
saketar/A
salexar/A
samar/A
satiriđar/A
scànxer/A
desekar/A
prosèguer/A
seƚar/A
senejar/A
deseparar/A
disestar/A
konsiderar/A
sindikar/A
skaɉar/A
skarabocar/A
inskatoƚar/A
skisar/A
skresolar/A
skuarŧar/A
solaɉar/A
resòlver/A
sòrber/A
sovraniđar/A
inspaxemar/A
inspesir/A
inspinar/A
sporkar/A
sorastar/A
starnudir/A
staxonar/A
stiƚetar/A
stivaƚar/A
strakoƚar/A
kostrénxer/A
destropar/A
stuđar/A
sufragar/A
insurir/A
taɉar/A
takidar/A
tapesar/A
tartufolar/A
destaveƚar/A
esténder/A
tenporedar/A
aparteñir/A
sostèñer/A
terapienar/A
texorar/A
intitolar/A
tolerar/A
tonfolar/A
retornar/A
stòrđer/A
sotràer/A
trangujar/A
estratar/A
destregoƚar/A
tridoƚar/A
tronbar/A
truŧidar/A
desakolar/A
ŧavariar/A
ŧefar/A
sentraƚixar/A
serkar/A
inŧetar/A
ŧifolar/A
simoƚar/A
insipriar/A
sokolar/A
sotiñar/A
unir/A
invàder/A
xvaƚivar/A
soravansar/A
ravéder/A
invelenar/A
ventiƚar/A
kontraveñir/A
soravèñer/A
vergiđar/A
vernidar/A
vesigar/A
deviar/A
vinkoƚar/A
dexviŧiar/A
invodar/A
revoler/A
voltoƚar/A
vulnerar/A
xbaratar/A
inxentiƚir/A
xironar/A
xmorfiar/A
exultar/A
gàlder/A
siñifegar/A
deríder/A
kanaliđar/A
selesionar/A
kanajar/A
infigar/A
inŧerpidir/A
racar/A
xbriŧolar/A
xgargotar/A
spetenar/A
xeneralixar/A
kansonar/A
deskair/A
diɉerir/A
